Florida, session 2026, SB626.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 1003.22, Florida 10 Statutes, is amended to read: 11 1003.22âSchool-entry health examinations; immunization 12 against communicable diseases; exemptions; duties of Department 13 of Health.â 14 (3)âThe Department of Health may adopt rules necessary to 15 administer and enforce this section. The Department of Health, 16 after consultation with the Department of Education, shall adopt 17 rules governing the immunization of children against, the 18 testing for, and the control of preventable communicable 19 diseases. The rules must include procedures for exempting a 20 child from immunization requirements. Immunizations shall be 21 required for poliomyelitis, diphtheria, rubeola, rubella, 22 pertussis, mumps, tetanus, hepatitis B, chickenpox, haemophilus 23 influenzae type b, pneumococcal disease, and other communicable 24 diseases as determined by rules of the Department of Health. The 25 manner and frequency of administration of the immunization or 26 testing shall conform to recognized standards of medical 27 practice. The Department of Health shall supervise and secure 28 the enforcement of the required immunization. Immunizations 29 required by this section shall be available at no cost from the 30 county health departments. 31 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.